trunk/resultats/catalan.dic
abatollava/AZ
aborronava/AZ
abroquerava/AZ
acanonava/AZ
acatxava/AZ
aclamava/AZ
acondiciava/AZ
acromatitzava/AZ
addicionava/AZ
adolorava/AZ
advocava/AZ
afeixugava/AZ
afirmava/AZ
afusava/AZ
agibellava/AZ
agreujava/AZ
aidava/AZ
ajustava/AZ
alenava/AZ
alleugerava/AZ
alquilava/AZ
alçurava/AZ
amatinava/AZ
amnistiava/AZ
amoïnava/AZ
anatomitzava/AZ
aniquilava/AZ
anul·lava/AZ
aparedava/AZ
apequinava/AZ
aplatava/AZ
aposava/AZ
apropinquava/AZ
aquistava/AZ
armejava/AZ
arranava/AZ
arrencava/AZ
arrogava/AZ
articulava/AZ
assagetava/AZ
assestava/AZ
astrolicava/AZ
atendava/AZ
atracallava/AZ
augurava/AZ
aventurava/AZ
avortava/AZ
balafiava/A
bancalejava/A
barbotejava/A
bastejava/A
belegava/A
besllumava/A
blandava/A
bogava/A
boquejava/A
borrufejava/A
brandava/A
brocava/A
brugolava/A
burocratitzava/A
cabridava/A
calaixejava/A
calorejava/A
canejava/A
capbussejava/A
capllevava/A
caramel·litzava/A
carnificava/A
castigava/A
cavallonava/A
cerclava/A
cintrava/A
clapotejava/A
cloquejava/A
cofava/A
colorava/A
comarejava/A
companejava/A
comprava/A
condecorava/A
confortava/A
conillava/A
consellava/A
consumava/A
contractava/A
contraposava/A
convulsava/A
corcorcava/A
corroborava/A
cranquejava/A
crismava/A
cuetejava/A
curullava/A
debel·lava/A
decuplicava/A
deixatava/A
demanava/A
depauperava/A
desabillava/A
desacreditava/A
desajuntava/A
desancorava/A
desarcaïtzava/A
desarrendava/A
desatansava/A
desblocava/A
desbudellava/A
descarbonatava/A
descintrava/A
desconfiava/A
descoronava/A
desdejunava/A
desembalava/A
desembogava/A
desembrocava/A
desemmetzinava/A
desemparava/A
desempipava/A
desencabassava/A
desencarava/A
desencepava/A
desencortinava/A
desenfadava/A
desenfornava/A
desengravava/A
desenllosava/A
desenrogallava/A
desensucrava/A
desentrenava/A
desescumava/A
desfanatitzava/A
desforestava/A
desgomava/A
deshidrogenava/A
desinsaculava/A
deslligava/A
desmaridava/A
desmoralitzava/A
desnucava/A
desoxidava/A
despedregava/A
despolititzava/A
dessalava/A
destarotava/A
destravava/A
desvesava/A
detestava/A
dictaminava/A
dilucidava/A
discriminava/A
dissenyava/A
doblava/A
dopava/A
dujava/A
eixalbava/AZ
eixonava/AZ
emanava/AZ
embalsamava/AZ
embarrellava/AZ
emblancava/AZ
emborratxava/AZ
emboçava/AZ
embussava/AZ
emmanllevava/AZ
emmidonava/AZ
empadronava/AZ
emparamentava/AZ
empatollava/AZ
emperlava/AZ
empitarrava/AZ
empolsinava/AZ
empremtava/AZ
enarcava/AZ
encaixava/AZ
encanonava/AZ
encapçalava/AZ
encasava/AZ
encepava/AZ
encintava/AZ
encofrava/AZ
encorralava/AZ
encruava/AZ
endinsava/AZ
enfadava/AZ
enferrissava/AZ
enforfollava/AZ
enfusellava/AZ
enganxava/AZ
engendrava/AZ
engrapava/AZ
enguerxinava/AZ
enllandava/AZ
enllorava/AZ
enquestava/AZ
enrastellerava/AZ
enrivetava/AZ
ensaginava/AZ
enseuava/AZ
ensucrava/AZ
entaulellava/AZ
entomava/AZ
entrebancava/AZ
entrelligava/AZ
entretelava/AZ
enturava/AZ
envernissava/AZ
enviudava/AZ
equiponderava/AZ
esbadiava/AZ
esbarzerava/AZ
esbombava/AZ
esbrinava/AZ
esbutxacava/AZ
escaldufava/AZ
escanviava/AZ
escarmenava/AZ
escassejava/AZ
esclatava/AZ
escopinava/AZ
escotxegava/AZ
escuixava/AZ
esfetgegava/AZ
esgarrapava/AZ
esgrafiava/AZ
eslingava/AZ
esmerdissava/AZ
esmussava/AZ
esparracava/AZ
espelegava/AZ
esperançava/AZ
espigava/AZ
espiritualitzava/AZ
espollinava/AZ
espunyava/AZ
esquerdillava/AZ
estafava/AZ
estepitzava/AZ
estimbava/AZ
estorinava/AZ
estricava/AZ
estuprava/AZ
eteritzava/AZ
exaltava/AZ
exculpava/AZ
expatriava/AZ
expulsava/AZ
extremava/AZ
falsificava/A
fascinava/A
femtava/A
ficava/A
finejava/A
flamava/A
floculava/A
follava/A
forfollejava/A
fosforitzava/A
frasejava/A
fronterejava/A
furetejava/A
galibava/A
ganejava/A
gargaritzava/A
gatgejava/A
generava/A
gloriava/A
gotejava/A
graponava/A
grifolejava/A
guardava/A
guisava/A
hemodialitzava/AZ
hipotecava/AZ
hostilitzava/AZ
imantava/AZ
implorava/AZ
imputava/AZ
inculcava/AZ
inebriava/AZ
informava/AZ
inseminava/AZ
instrumentava/AZ
interpolava/AZ
invalidava/AZ
irritava/AZ
jovenejava/A
lacrava/A
levitava/A
lladrunyava/A
llanejava/A
llengotejava/A
llisonava/A
llufava/A
madrigalejava/A
malcasava/A
malmenava/A
manducava/A
manyuclava/A
marradejava/A
masticava/A
medicava/A
menstruava/A
mesturava/A
migmatitzava/A
miolava/A
moderava/A
monoftongava/A
mossegava/A
muntanyejava/A
napejava/A
negociejava/A
nitrificava/A
novel·lava/A
obsequiava/AZ
odorava/AZ
opilava/AZ
orientalitzava/AZ
oscava/AZ
pagesejava/A
palpunyava/A
parapetava/A
participava/A
patollava/A
pellava/A
peptitzava/A
perjudicava/A
personava/A
petjava/A
pilloscava/A
pispava/A
plantejava/A
plorinyava/A
policopiava/A
popava/A
postdatava/A
precipitava/A
premiava/A
pressupostava/A
privava/A
prologava/A
prosificava/A
pullejava/A
quarantejava/A
quintaessenciava/A
rallava/A
rapinyava/A
ratinava/A
realçava/A
rebostejava/A
recapitulava/A
reclutava/A
recontava/A
redoblava/A
reencunyava/A
refinava/A
regalava/A
regnava/A
reimportava/A
rellentava/A
remintolava/A
renillava/A
repapava/A
replantejava/A
repulsava/A
resinificava/A
ressobinava/A
retocava/A
retxava/A
revigoritzava/A
ricava/A
rogejava/A
ronxava/A
rufejava/A
sacava/A
salinava/A
saludava/A
saquejava/A
segava/A
senzillava/A
sextuplicava/A
sindicava/A
sobrealçava/A
sobreplomava/A
sofisticava/A
sollava/A
sonsejava/A
sotaplujava/A
subinfeudava/A
subvencionava/A
suplicava/A
tacava/A
tancava/A
tastanejava/A
temorejava/A
tercejava/A
testimoniejava/A
tirotejava/A
toquejava/A
torçava/A
tragirava/A
transitava/A
trasmudava/A
travessava/A
trepidava/A
trinava/A
troncava/A
turbinava/A
ultrapassava/AZ
usufructuava/AZ
valsava/A
velejava/A
veremava/A
vetllava/A
vintejava/A
vogava/A
vulnerava/A
xarbotejava/A
xerricava/A
xocava/A
